Washington statutes.
RCW 11.72.002

Delivery of specific property to distributee before final decree.

Upon application of the personal representative, with or without notice as the court may direct, the court may order the personal representative to deliver to any distributee who consents to it, possession of any specific real or personal property to which he or she is entitled under the terms of the will or by intestacy, provided that other distributees and claimants are not prejudiced thereby. The court may at any time prior to the decree of final distribution order him or her to return such property to the personal representative, if it is for the best interests of the estate. The court may require the distributee to give security for such return.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2060; 1965 c 145 s 11.72.002.]